Illinois, session 104th, HB5057.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Crime Victims Compensation Act is amended 5by changing Sections 2, 6.1, 7.1, and 10.2 as follows: 6    (740 ILCS 45/2)7    Sec. 2. Definitions. As used in this Act, unless the 8context otherwise requires:9    (a) "Applicant" means any of the following claiming 10compensation under this Act:11        (1) A victim.12        (2) If the victim was a guardian or primary caregiver 13    to an adult who is physically or mentally incapacitated, 14    that adult who is physically or mentally incapacitated.15        (3) A guardian of a minor or of a person under legal 16    disability.17        (4) A person who, at the time the crime occurred, 18    resided in the same dwelling as the victim, solely for the 19    purpose of compensating for any of the following:20            (A) Pecuniary loss incurred for psychological 21        treatment of a mental or emotional condition caused or 22        aggravated by the crime.23            (B) Loss of earnings under paragraph (14.5) of   HB5057- 2 -LRB104 20490 JRC 33962 b1        subsection (h) for time off from work necessary to 2        provide full time care for the injured victim.3            (C) Relocation expenses.4        (5) A person who assumes a legal obligation or 5    voluntarily pays for a victim's medical or funeral or 6    burial expenses.7        (6) Any other person the Court of Claims or the 8    Attorney General finds is entitled to compensation.9    The changes made to this subsection by Public Act 101-652 10apply to actions commenced or pending on or after January 1, 112022.12    (b) "Court of Claims" means the Court of Claims created by 13the Court of Claims Act.14    (c) "Crime of violence" means and includes any offense 15defined in Sections 9-1, 9-1.2, 9-2, 9-2.1, 9-3, 9-3.2, 10-1, 1610-2, 10-9, 11-1.20, 11-1.30, 11-1.40, 11-1.50, 11-1.60, 1711-11, 11-20.1, 11-23, 11-23.5, 12-1, 12-2, 12-3, 12-3.05, 1812-3.1, 12-3.2, 12-3.3, 12-3.4, 12-5, 12-7.1, 12-7.3, 12-7.4, 1912-20.5, 20-1 or 20-1.1, or Section 12-3.05 except for 20subdivision (a)(4) or (g)(1), or subdivision (a)(4) of Section 2111-14.4, of the Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 222012, Sections 1(a) and 1(a-5) of the Cemetery Protection Act, 23Section 125 of the Stalking No Contact Order Act, Section 219 24of the Civil No Contact Order Act, driving under the influence 25as defined in Section 11-501 of the Illinois Vehicle Code, a 26violation of Section 11-401 of the Illinois Vehicle Code,   HB5057- 3 -LRB104 20490 JRC 33962 b1provided the victim was a pedestrian or was operating a 2vehicle moved solely by human power or a mobility device at the 3time of contact, and a violation of Section 11-204.1 of the 4Illinois Vehicle Code; so long as the offense did not occur 5during a civil riot, insurrection or rebellion. "Crime of 6violence" does not include any other offense or crash 7involving a motor vehicle except those vehicle offenses 8specifically provided for in this paragraph. "Crime of 9violence" does include all of the offenses specifically 10provided for in this paragraph that occur within this State 11but are subject to federal jurisdiction and crimes involving 12terrorism as defined in 18 U.S.C. 2331.13    (d) "Victim" means (1) a person killed or injured in this 14State as a result of a crime of violence perpetrated or 15attempted against him or her, (2) the spouse, parent, or child 16of a person killed or injured in this State as a result of a 17crime of violence perpetrated or attempted against the person, 18or anyone living in the dwelling of a person killed or injured 19in a relationship that is substantially similar to that of a 20parent, spouse, or child, (3) a person killed or injured in 21this State while attempting to assist a person against whom a 22crime of violence is being perpetrated or attempted, if that 23attempt of assistance would be expected of a reasonable person 24under the circumstances, (4) a person killed or injured in 25this State while assisting a law enforcement official 26apprehend a person who has perpetrated a crime of violence or   HB5057- 4 -LRB104 20490 JRC 33962 b1prevent the perpetration of any such crime if that assistance 2was in response to the express request of the law enforcement 3official, (5) a person who personally witnessed a violent 4crime, (5.05) a person who will be called as a witness by the 5prosecution to establish a necessary nexus between the 6offender and the violent crime, (5.1) any person who is the 7grandparent, grandchild, brother, sister, half brother, or 8half sister of a person killed or injured in this State as a 9result of a crime of violence, applying solely for the purpose 10of compensating for pecuniary loss incurred for psychological 11treatment of a mental or emotional condition caused or 12aggravated by the crime, loss of earnings under paragraph 13(14.5) of subsection (h) for time off from work necessary to 14provide full time care for the injured victim, or relocation 15if the crime occurred within the dwelling of the applicant, 16(5.2) any person who was in a dating relationship with a person 17killed in this State as a result of a crime of violence, solely 18for the purpose of compensating for pecuniary loss incurred 19for psychological treatment of a mental or emotional condition 20caused or aggravated by the crime, (6) an Illinois resident 21who is a victim of a "crime of violence" as defined in this Act 22except, if the crime occurred outside this State, the resident 23has the same rights under this Act as if the crime had occurred 24in this State upon a showing that the state, territory, 25country, or political subdivision of a country in which the 26crime occurred does not have a compensation of victims of   HB5057- 5 -LRB104 20490 JRC 33962 b1crimes law for which that Illinois resident is eligible, (7) 2the parent, spouse, or child of a deceased person whose body is 3dismembered or whose remains are desecrated as the result of a 4crime of violence, (8) (blank), or (9) an individual who is 5injured or killed in an incident in which a law enforcement 6officer's use of force caused bodily harm or death to that 7individual.8    (e) "Dependent" means a relative of a deceased victim who 9was wholly or partially dependent upon the victim's income at 10the time of his or her death and shall include the child of a 11victim born after his or her death.12    (f) "Relative" means a spouse, parent, grandparent, 13stepfather, stepmother, child, grandchild, brother, 14brother-in-law, sister, sister-in-law, half brother, half 15sister, spouse's parent, nephew, niece, uncle, aunt, or anyone 16living in the dwelling of a person killed or injured in a 17relationship that is substantially similar to that of a 18parent, spouse, or child.19    (g) "Child" means a son or daughter and includes a 20stepchild, an adopted child or a child born out of wedlock.21    (h) "Pecuniary loss" means:22        (1) in the case of injury, appropriate medical 23    expenses and hospital expenses including expenses of 24    medical examinations, rehabilitation, medically required 25    nursing care expenses, appropriate psychiatric care or 26    psychiatric counseling expenses, appropriate expenses for   HB5057- 6 -LRB104 20490 JRC 33962 b1    care or counseling by a licensed clinical psychologist, 2    licensed clinical social worker, licensed professional 3    counselor, or licensed clinical professional counselor and 4    expenses for treatment by Christian Science practitioners 5    and nursing care appropriate thereto;6        (2) transportation expenses to and from medical and 7    counseling treatment facilities;8        (3) prosthetic appliances, eyeglasses, and hearing 9    aids necessary or damaged as a result of the crime;10        (4) expenses incurred for the towing and storage of a 11    victim's vehicle in connection with a crime of violence, 12    to a maximum of $1,000;13        (5) costs associated with trafficking tattoo removal 14    by a person authorized or licensed to perform the specific 15    removal procedure; for victims of offenses defined in 16    Section 10-9 of the Criminal Code of 2012, the victim 17    shall submit a statement under oath on a form prescribed 18    by the Attorney General attesting that the removed tattoo 19    was applied in connection with the commission of the 20    offense;21        (6) replacement costs for clothing and bedding used as 22    evidence;23        (7) costs associated with temporary lodging or 24    relocation necessary as a result of the crime, including, 25    but not limited to, the first 2 months' rent and security 26    deposit of the dwelling that the claimant relocated to and   HB5057- 7 -LRB104 20490 JRC 33962 b1    other reasonable relocation expenses incurred as a result 2    of the violent crime;3        (8) locks, doors, or windows necessary or damaged as a 4    result of the crime;5        (9) the purchase, lease, or rental of equipment 6    necessary to create usability of and accessibility to the 7    victim's real and personal property, or the real and 8    personal property which is used by the victim, necessary 9    as a result of the crime; "real and personal property" 10    includes, but is not limited to, vehicles, houses, 11    apartments, townhouses, or condominiums; 12        (10) the costs of appropriate crime scene clean-up;13        (11) replacement services loss, to a maximum of $1,250 14    per month, with this amount to be divided in proportion to 15    the amount of the actual loss among those entitled to 16    compensation;17        (12) dependents replacement services loss, to a 18    maximum of $1,250 per month, with this amount to be 19    divided in proportion to the amount of the actual loss 20    among those entitled to compensation;21        (13) loss of tuition paid to attend grammar school or 22    high school when the victim had been enrolled as a student 23    prior to the injury, or college or graduate school when 24    the victim had been enrolled as a day or night student 25    prior to the injury when the victim becomes unable to 26    continue attendance at school as a result of the crime of   HB5057- 8 -LRB104 20490 JRC 33962 b1    violence perpetrated against him or her;2        (14) loss of earnings, loss of future earnings because 3    of disability resulting from the injury. Loss of future 4    earnings shall be reduced by any income from substitute 5    work actually performed by the victim or by income the 6    victim would have earned in available appropriate 7    substitute work the victim was capable of performing but 8    unreasonably failed to undertake; loss of earnings and 9    loss of future earnings shall be determined on the basis 10    of the victim's average net monthly earnings for the 6 11    months immediately preceding the date of the injury or on 12    $2,400 per month, whichever is less, or, in cases where 13    the absences commenced more than 3 years from the date of 14    the crime, on the basis of the net monthly earnings for the 15    6 months immediately preceding the date of the first 16    absence, not to exceed $2,400 per month; 17        (14.5) loss of earnings for applicants or loss of 18    future earnings for applicants. The applicant must 19    demonstrate that the loss of earnings is a direct result 20    of circumstances attributed to the crime including, but 21    not limited to, court appearances, funeral preparation and 22    bereavement, receipt of medical or psychological care; 23    loss of earnings and loss of future earnings shall be 24    determined on the basis of the applicant's average net 25    monthly earnings for the 6 months immediately preceding 26    the date of the injury or on $2,400 per month, whichever is   HB5057- 9 -LRB104 20490 JRC 33962 b1    less, or, in cases where the absences commenced more than 2    3 years from the date of the crime, on the basis of the net 3    monthly earnings for the 6 months immediately preceding 4    the date of the first absence, not to exceed $2,400 per 5    month; 6        (15) loss of support of the dependents of the victim. 7    Loss of support shall be determined on the basis of the 8    victim's average net monthly earnings for the 6 months 9    immediately preceding the date of the injury or on $2,400 10    per month, whichever is less, or, in cases where the 11    absences commenced more than 3 years from the date of the 12    crime, on the basis of the net monthly earnings for the 6 13    months immediately preceding the date of the first 14    absence, not to exceed $2,400 per month. If a divorced or 15    legally separated applicant is claiming loss of support 16    for a minor child of the deceased, the amount of support 17    for each child shall be based either on the amount of 18    support pursuant to the judgment prior to the date of the 19    deceased victim's injury or death, or, if the subject of 20    pending litigation filed by or on behalf of the divorced 21    or legally separated applicant prior to the injury or 22    death, on the result of that litigation. Loss of support 23    for minors shall be divided in proportion to the amount of 24    the actual loss among those entitled to such compensation; 25        (16) in the case of death, expenses for reasonable 26    funeral, burial, headstone, cremation, and travel and   HB5057- 10 -LRB104 20490 JRC 33962 b1    transport for survivors of homicide victims to secure 2    bodies of deceased victims and to transport bodies for 3    burial all of which may be awarded up to a maximum of 4    $10,000 for each victim. Other individuals that have paid 5    or become obligated to pay funeral, cremation, or burial 6    expenses, including a headstone, for the deceased shall 7    share a maximum award of $10,000, with the award divided 8    in proportion to the amount of the actual loss among those 9    entitled to compensation;10        (17) in the case of dismemberment or desecration of a 11    body, expenses for reasonable funeral, burial, headstone, 12    and cremation, all of which may be awarded up to a maximum 13    of $10,000 for each victim. Other individuals that have 14    paid or become obligated to pay funeral, cremation, or 15    burial expenses, including a headstone, for the deceased 16    shall share a maximum award of $10,000, with the award 17    divided in proportion to the amount of the actual loss 18    among those entitled to compensation; and19        (18) (19) legal fees resulting from proceedings that 20    became necessary solely because of the crime, including, 21    but not limited to, establishing a legal guardian for the 22    minor victim or the minor child of a victim, or obtaining a 23    restraining order, no contact order, or order of 24    protection, awarded up to a maximum of $3,500. 25    "Pecuniary loss" does not include pain and suffering or 26property loss or damage.  HB5057- 11 -LRB104 20490 JRC 33962 b1    The changes made to this subsection by Public Act 101-652 2apply to actions commenced or pending on or after January 1, 32022. 4    (i) "Replacement services loss" means expenses reasonably 5incurred in obtaining ordinary and necessary services in lieu 6of those the injured person would have performed, not for 7income, but for the benefit of himself or herself or his or her 8family, if he or she had not been injured.9    (j) "Dependents replacement services loss" means loss 10reasonably incurred by dependents or private legal guardians 11of minor dependents after a victim's death in obtaining 12ordinary and necessary services in lieu of those the victim 13would have performed, not for income, but for their benefit, 14if he or she had not been fatally injured.15    (k) "Survivor" means immediate family including a parent, 16stepfather, stepmother, child, brother, sister, or spouse.17    (l) "Parent" means a natural parent, adopted parent, 18stepparent, or permanent legal guardian of another person.19    (m) "Trafficking tattoo" is a tattoo which is applied to a 20victim in connection with the commission of a violation of 21Section 10-9 of the Criminal Code of 2012.22    (n) "Dwelling" means a person's primary home. A person may 23be required to provide verification or proof of residence 24including, but not limited to, a lease agreement, utility 25bill, license registration, document showing the mailing 26address, pay stub, tax form, or notarized statement.  HB5057- 12 -LRB104 20490 JRC 33962 b1    (o) "Dating relationship" means a current, continuous, 2romantic, courtship, or engagement relationship, often 3characterized by actions of an intimate or sexual nature or an 4expectation of affection. "Dating relationship" does not 5include a casual acquaintanceship or ordinary fraternization 6between persons in a business or social context.7    (p) "Medical facility" means a facility for the delivery 8of health services. "Medical facility" includes, but is not 9limited to, a hospital, public health center, outpatient 10medical facility, federally qualified health center, migrant 11health center, community health center, or State correctional 12institution.13    (q) "Mental health provider" means a licensed clinical 14psychologist, a licensed clinical social worker, a licensed 15professional counselor, or a licensed clinical professional 16counselor as defined in the Mental Health and Developmental 17Disabilities Code.18    (r) "Independent medical evaluation" means an assessment 19by a mental health provider who is not currently providing 20treatment to the applicant and will not seek reimbursement 21from the program for continuing treatment after the 22assessment. A provider may seek reimbursement for the 23assessment.24(Source: P.A. 102-27, eff. 6-25-21; 102-905, eff. 1-1-23; 25102-982, eff. 7-1-23; 103-154, eff. 6-30-23; 103-564, eff. 2611-17-23; 103-1037, eff. 1-1-25; revised 6-23-25.)   HB5057- 13 -LRB104 20490 JRC 33962 b1    (740 ILCS 45/6.1)  (from Ch. 70, par. 76.1)2    Sec. 6.1. Right to compensation. A person is entitled to 3compensation under this Act if:4        (a) Timing. Within 5 years of the occurrence of the 5    crime, or within one year after a criminal charge of a 6    person for an offense, upon which the claim is based, the 7    applicant presents an application, under oath, to the 8    Attorney General that is filed with the Court of Claims 9    and on a form prescribed in accordance with Section 7.1 10    furnished by the Attorney General. If the person entitled 11    to compensation is under 18 years of age or under other 12    legal disability at the time of the occurrence or is 13    determined by a court to be under a legal disability as a 14    result of the occurrence, he or she may present the 15    application required by this subsection within 3 years 16    after he or she attains the age of 18 years or the 17    disability is removed, as the case may be. Legal 18    disability includes a diagnosis of posttraumatic stress 19    disorder. 20        (a-1) The Attorney General and the Court of Claims may 21    accept an application presented after the period provided 22    in subsection (a) if the Attorney General determines that 23    the applicant had good cause for a delay. 24        (b) Notification. The appropriate law enforcement 25    officials were notified within 72 hours of the   HB5057- 14 -LRB104 20490 JRC 33962 b1    perpetration of the crime allegedly causing the death or 2    injury to the victim. If the notification was made more 3    than 72 hours after the perpetration of the crime and the 4    applicant establishes that the notice was timely under the 5    circumstances, the Attorney General and the Court of 6    Claims may extend the time for reporting to law 7    enforcement. 8        For victims of offenses defined in Sections 10-9, 9    11-1.20, 11-1.30, 11-1.40, 11-1.50, 11-1.60, 12-13, and 10    12-14 of the Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 11    2012, the appropriate law enforcement officials were 12    notified within 7 days of the perpetration of the crime 13    allegedly causing death or injury to the victim or, if the 14    notification was made more than 7 days after the 15    perpetration of the crime, the applicant establishes that 16    the notice was timely under the circumstances. 17        (b-1) If, in lieu of a law enforcement report, the 18    applicant or victim has obtained an order of protection, a 19    civil no contact order, or a stalking no contact order, 20    has presented to a medical facility for medical care or 21    sexual assault evidence collection, has presented to a 22    mental health provider for mental health care or 23    evaluation an independent medical evaluation, or is 24    engaged in a legal proceeding involving a claim that the 25    applicant or victim is a victim of human trafficking or 26    law enforcement use of force, such action shall constitute   HB5057- 15 -LRB104 20490 JRC 33962 b1    appropriate notification under this Section.2        (b-2) For purposes of notification under this Act, a 3    victim who presents to a medical facility or mental health 4    provider shall provide information sufficient to fulfill 5    the requirements of this Section, except that the victim 6    shall not be required to identify the offender to the 7    medical or mental health provider. 8        (b-3) An applicant who is filing a claim that a law 9    enforcement officer's use of force caused injury or death, 10    may fulfill the notification requirement by complying with 11    subsection (b), filing a complaint with the Illinois Law 12    Enforcement Training Standards Board, filing a lawsuit 13    against a law enforcement officer or department, or 14    presenting evidence that the victim has obtained a 15    settlement or a verdict in a civil suit. An application 16    filed by an individual presenting evidence of a verdict in 17    a civil suit must be filed within one year after the 18    resolution of the civil suit. 19        (b-4) An applicant may provide notification to a 20    mental health provider regarding physical or psychological 21    injuries of the victim or for victims of offenses defined 22    in Sections 10-9, 11-1.20, 11-1.30, 11-1.40, 11-1.50, 23    11-1.60, 11-14.4, 12-3.2, 12-3.3, 12-3.4, 12-7.3, 12-7.4 24    of the Criminal Code of 2012, psychological injuries 25    resulting from the commission of the crime for which the 26    applicant is filing an application. The provider shall   HB5057- 16 -LRB104 20490 JRC 33962 b1    perform an independent medical evaluation and provide the 2    provider's professional opinion as to whether the injuries 3    claimed are consistent with having resulted from the 4    commission of the crime for which the applicant is filing 5    an application. 6        Upon completion of the independent medical evaluation, 7    the mental health provider shall complete a certification 8    form, signed under oath. The form shall be provided by the 9    Office of the Attorney General, be available on its 10    website, and contain the following: 11            (1) The provider's name, title, license number and 12        place of employment.13            (2) Contact information for the provider.14            (3) The provider's relationship with the 15        applicant.16            (4) The date the crime was reported to the 17        provider.18            (5) The reported crime.19            (6) The date and location of the crime.20            (7) If there are physical injuries, what injuries 21        that the mental health provider can attest to being 22        present on the day of the reporting if they are 23        consistent with the crime reported to the provider.24            (8) If there are psychological injuries, whether 25        the provider in his or her professional opinion 26        believes that the injuries presented on the day of the   HB5057- 17 -LRB104 20490 JRC 33962 b1        reporting are consistent with the crime reported to 2        the provider.3            (9) A detailed summary of the incident, as 4        reported.5            (10) Any documentation or photos that relates 6        relate to the crime of violence for which the 7        applicant is seeking reimbursement. 8        (c) Cooperation. The applicant has cooperated with law 9    enforcement officials in the apprehension and prosecution 10    of the assailant. If the applicant or victim has obtained 11    an order of protection, a civil no contact order, or a 12    stalking no contact order, has presented to a medical 13    facility for medical care or sexual assault evidence 14    collection, obtained an evaluation independent medical 15    examination from a mental health provider as described in 16    subsection (b-4), has taken any of the actions described 17    in subsection (b-3), or is engaged in a legal proceeding 18    involving a claim that the applicant or victim is a victim 19    of human trafficking, such action shall constitute 20    cooperation under this subsection (c). If the victim is 21    under 18 years of age at the time of the commission of the 22    offense, the following shall constitute cooperation under 23    this subsection (c): 24            (1) the applicant or the victim files a police 25        report with a law enforcement agency;26            (2) a mandated reporter reports the crime to law   HB5057- 18 -LRB104 20490 JRC 33962 b1        enforcement; or2            (3) a person with firsthand knowledge of the crime 3        reports the crime to law enforcement. 4        In evaluating cooperation, the Attorney General and 5    Court of Claims may consider the victim's age, physical 6    condition, psychological state, cultural or linguistic 7    barriers, and compelling health and safety concerns, 8    including, but not limited to, a reasonable fear of 9    retaliation or harm that would jeopardize the well-being 10    of the victim or the victim's family, and giving due 11    consideration to the degree of cooperation that the victim 12    or derivative victim is capable of in light of the 13    presence of any of these factors, or any other factor the 14    Attorney General considers relevant. 15        (d) If the applicant is not barred from receiving 16    compensation under Section 10.1.17        (e) (Blank).18        (f) (Blank).19        (g) (Blank).20        (h) Furnishing an evaluation as described in 21    subsection (b-4) or furnishing another document as 22    evidence of notification or cooperation under this Section 23    may not be construed to waive any confidentiality or 24    privilege that may exist between the victim or applicant 25    and a third party. 26    The changes made to this Section by this amendatory Act of   HB5057- 19 -LRB104 20490 JRC 33962 b1the 101st General Assembly apply to actions commenced or 2pending on or after January 1, 2022.3(Source: P.A. 102-27, eff. 6-25-21; 103-1037, eff. 1-1-25.) 4    (740 ILCS 45/7.1)  (from Ch. 70, par. 77.1)5    Sec. 7.1. (a) The application form furnished by the Office 6of the Attorney General and published on its Internet website 7shall include fields for the applicant to set out: 8        (1) the name and address of the victim;9        (2) if the victim is deceased, the name and address of 10    the applicant and his or her relationship to the victim, 11    the names and addresses of other persons dependent on the 12    victim for their support and the extent to which each is so 13    dependent, and other persons who may be entitled to 14    compensation for a pecuniary loss;15        (3) the date and nature of the crime on which the 16    application for compensation is based;17        (4) the date and place where notification under 18    Section 6.1 was given and to whom, or the date and place of 19    issuance of an order of protection, no contact order, 20    evidence of a legal proceeding involving human 21    trafficking, or in cases of a law enforcement officer's 22    use of force, another form of documentation allowable 23    under Section 6.1;24        (4.5) if the victim is providing supplemental forms of 25    documentation, that documentation, the date the victim   HB5057- 20 -LRB104 20490 JRC 33962 b1    obtained that other form of documentation and the type of 2    documentation; 3        (5) the nature and extent of the injuries sustained by 4    the victim, and the names and addresses of those giving 5    medical and hospitalization treatment to the victim;6        (6) the pecuniary loss to the applicant and to such 7    other persons as are specified under item (2) resulting 8    from the injury or death;9        (7) the amount of benefits, payments, or awards, if 10    any, payable under:11            (a) the Workers' Compensation Act,12            (b) the Dram Shop Act,13            (c) any claim, demand, or cause of action based 14        upon the crime-related injury or death,15            (d) the Federal Medicare program,16            (e) the State Public Aid program,17            (f) Social Security Administration burial 18        benefits,19            (g) Veterans administration burial benefits,20            (h) life, health, accident, vehicle, towing, or 21        liability insurance,22            (i) the Criminal Victims' Escrow Account Act,23            (j) the Sexual Assault Survivors Emergency 24        Treatment Act, 25            (k) restitution, or 26            (l) any other source;  HB5057- 21 -LRB104 20490 JRC 33962 b1        (8) releases authorizing the surrender to the Court of 2    Claims or Attorney General of reports, documents and other 3    information relating to the matters specified under this 4    Act and rules promulgated in accordance with the Act;5        (9) such other information as the Court of Claims or 6    the Attorney General reasonably requires; or .7        (10) whether the applicant is applying for an 8    emergency award under subsection 10.2. 9    (b) The Attorney General may require that materials 10substantiating the facts stated in the application be 11submitted with that application.12    (b-5) The victim or applicant may provide to the Attorney 13General a sworn statement by the victim or applicant that 14attests to the victim's or applicant's experience of a crime 15or crimes of violence, in addition to documentation required 16under this Act. If the victim or applicant has additional 17corroborating evidence beyond those described in this Act, the 18victim or applicant may provide the following documents: law 19enforcement report; medical records; confirmation of sexual 20assault evidence collection; order of protection; civil no 21contact order, stalking no contact order; photographs; letter 22from a service provider who serves victims of crime; affidavit 23from a witness of the crime of violence; court record; 24military record; or any other corroborating evidence. Such 25documentation or statement may be used to supplement required 26documentation to verify the incident but is not required. If   HB5057- 22 -LRB104 20490 JRC 33962 b1an applicant is seeking an exception under subsection (b) or 2(c-1) of Section 6.1, the applicant shall provide any 3additional documentation, information, or statement that 4substantiates the facts stated in the application. 5    (c) An applicant, on his or her own motion, may file an 6amended application or additional substantiating materials to 7correct inadvertent errors or omissions at any time before the 8original application has been disposed of by the Court of 9Claims or the Attorney General. In either case, the filing of 10additional information or of an amended application shall be 11considered for the purpose of this Act to have been filed at 12the same time as the original application.13    For claims submitted on or after January 1, 2022, an 14amended application or additional substantiating materials to 15correct inadvertent errors or omissions may be filed at any 16time before the original application is disposed of by the 17Attorney General or the Court of Claims.18    (d) Determinations submitted by the Attorney General to 19the Court of Claims shall be available to the Court of Claims 20for review. The Attorney General shall provide the sources and 21evidence relied upon as a basis for a compensation 22determination.23    (e) The changes made to this Section by this amendatory 24Act of the 101st General Assembly apply to actions commenced 25or pending on or after January 1, 2022. 26(Source: P.A. 102-27, eff. 6-25-21; 102-905, eff. 1-1-23;   HB5057- 23 -LRB104 20490 JRC 33962 b1103-1037, eff. 1-1-25.) 2    (740 ILCS 45/10.2)3    Sec. 10.2. Emergency awards. 4    (a) If it appears, prior to taking action on an 5application, that the claim is one for which compensation is 6probable, and undue hardship will result to the applicant if 7immediate payment is not made, the Attorney General may 8recommend and the Court may make an emergency award of 9compensation to the applicant, pending a final decision in the 10case. The Comptroller shall issue payment of an emergency 11award within 2 business days of receiving notice of the 12decision to grant the emergency award. Emergency awards may be 13issued to the applicant for the purpose of paying funeral and 14burial expenses directly to a funeral home for expenses that 15have been incurred or that the applicant has been quoted, and 16for relocation expenses incurred or due to be incurred by an 17applicant. The amount of emergency compensation shall be 18deducted from any final award made as a result of the claim. 19The full amount of the emergency award if no final award is 20made shall be repaid by the applicant to the State of Illinois. 21If the amount of emergency compensation exceeds the actual 22amount the applicant incurs, the difference shall be repaid to 23the State. 24    (b) Emergency award applicants must satisfy all 25requirements under Section 6.1 of this Act.  HB5057- 24 -LRB104 20490 JRC 33962 b1    (c) The Office of the Attorney General shall make 2available publicly on its website a separate form or online 3application for applicants to apply for an emergency award or 4include a designated section in the application form described 5by Section 7.1 of this Act for the applicant to request an 6emergency award. 7(Source: P.A. 102-27, eff. 1-1-22.)